Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.480

Emergency medical service districts—Creation authorized—Composition of governing body.

(1) A county legislative authority may adopt an ordinance creating an emergency medical service district in all or a portion of the unincorporated area of the county and, pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, within the corporate limits of any city or town. The ordinance may only be adopted after a public hearing has been held on the creation of such a district and the county legislative authority makes a finding that it is in the public interest to create the district.

An emergency medical service district shall be a quasi-municipal corporation and an independent taxing "authority" within the meaning of Article 7, Section 1, Washington State Constitution. Emergency medical service districts shall also be "taxing authorities" within the meaning of Article 7, Section 2, Washington State Constitution.

An emergency medical service district shall have the authority to provide emergency medical services.

(2) When any part of a proposed emergency medical service district includes an area within the corporate limits of a city or town, the governing body of the city or town shall approve the inclusion, and the county governing body shall maintain a certified copy of the resolution of approval before adopting an ordinance including the area.

(3) The members of the county legislative authority shall compose the governing body of any emergency medical service district which is created within the county: PROVIDED, That where an emergency medical service district includes an area within the corporate limits of a city or town, the emergency medical service district may be governed as provided in an interlocal agreement adopted pursuant to chapter 39.34 RCW. The voters of an emergency medical service district must be registered voters residing within the service area.

[ 2000 c 31 s 1; 1979 ex.s. c 200 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 200: See note following RCW 84.52.069.

Levy for emergency medical care and services: RCW 84.52.069.